Utah statutes.
31A-43-303.   Stop-loss insurance disclosure.

A stop-loss insurance contract delivered, issued for delivery, or entered into shall include the disclosure exhibit required by the commissioner through administrative rule, which shall include at least the following information:

(1)  the complete costs for the stop-loss contract;

(2)  the date on which the insurance takes effect and terminates, including renewability provisions;

(3)  the aggregate attachment point and the specific attachment point;

(4)  any limitations on coverage;

(5)  an explanation of monthly accommodation and disclosure about any monthly accommodation features included in the stop-loss contract; and

(6)  a description of terminal liability funding, including:

(a)  cost of processing claims before and after the termination of the contract; and

(b)  maximum claims liability to the employer.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

